Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TRANSCRIPTION FEES
SECTION 1.  ORS 21.345 is amended to read:
21.345. (1)(a) A transcriber may not charge more than [ $3] $4.25 per  page for preparation of a
transcript.
(b) The Judicial Department may periodically increase  the maximum fee a transcriber
may charge to account for changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers,
West Region (All Items),  as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor, since the last time the fee was increased. If the Judicial Department
increases the fee under this paragraph, the adjusted maximum fee shall be rounded to  the
nearest quarter dollar, but the unrounded amount  shall be used to calculate subsequent ad-
justments. The increased  fee becomes effective on July 1 following the election to increase
the fee and applies to transcripts ordered on  or after July 1 following the election to increase
the fee.
[(b)] (c) A transcriber may not charge a fee in addition to the fee established under this  sub-
section  for:
(A) An electronic copy required to be served on a party;
(B) A paper copy required to  be served on an unrepresented party under ORS 19.370 (4)(a) or
(b); or
(C) A paper copy required to be filed with the trial court under ORS 19.370 (4)(d).
(2) Except as  provided in subsection (3) of this section, a reporter employed by one of the parties
may charge fees as agreed to between the reporter and all of the parties to the proceeding  for
preparing transcripts on appeal. The reporter and the parties must agree  to the fees to be charged
before the commencement of the proceeding to be recorded. A share of any fees  agreed upon shall
be charged to parties joining the proceeding after the commencement of the proceeding.
(3) A reporter employed by one of the parties may not charge a  public body, as defined by ORS
174.109, fees for preparing transcripts on appeal that exceed the  fees established by subsection (1)
of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 1
(4) Each page of the original transcript  on appeal prepared under this section must be prepared
as specified by rules for transcripts on appeal adopted by the  Supreme Court and the Court of Ap-
peals.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by  law, the fees for preparing a transcript requested by a party
shall be paid forthwith by the party, and when paid shall be taxable as disbursements in the case.
The fees for preparing a transcript requested by the court, and not by a party, shall  be paid by the
state from funds available for the purpose.
(6) When the court provides personnel  to prepare transcripts from audio records of court pro-
ceedings, the fees provided in subsection (1) of this section to be  paid by a party shall be paid to
the clerk of the court.
(7) For purposes of this section, “transcript” has the meaning given that term in ORS 19.005.
SENIOR JUDGES
SECTION 2.
 ORS 1.300 is amended to read:
1.300. (1) A judge who retires from the circuit court, Oregon Tax  Court, Court of Appeals or
Supreme Court, except a judge retired under the provisions of ORS 1.310, may be designated a senior
judge of the State of Oregon by the Supreme Court and, if so designated, shall be so certified  by the
Secretary of State.
(2)(a) Upon filing with the Secretary of State an oath of office as a senior  judge as prescribed
in ORS 1.212, a senior judge  is eligible for temporary assignment, with the consent of the senior
judge, by  the [ Supreme Court ] Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or the designee of the Chief
Justice, to a state court as provided in this subsection, whenever the [ Supreme Court] Chief Justice
or the designee of the Chief Justice  determines that  the assignment is reasonably necessary and
will promote the [ more] efficient administration of justice.
(b) A senior judge who retired from the Supreme Court may be assigned under this subsection
to any state court.
(c) A senior judge  who retired from a court other than the Supreme Court may be assigned
under this subsection  to any state court other than the Supreme Court.
(d) A senior judge assigned to serve as a circuit court  judge may be assigned under this
subsection to serve in any one or more counties or judicial districts during  the term of the
assignment.
(3) The  assignment of a senior judge [ shall be made by an order which ] shall designate the court
or courts  to which the judge  is assigned and the duration of the assignment. [ Promptly after as-
signment of a  senior judge under this section, the Supreme Court shall cause a certified copy of the
order to be sent to the senior judge and another certified  copy to the court to which the judge is as-
signed.] The Chief Justice or the  designee of the Chief Justice shall promptly notify the senior
judge, and the court or courts to which the judge is assigned, of the assignment.
(4) Each senior judge assigned as provided in this section has all the judicial powers  and duties,
while serving under the assignment, of  a regularly elected and qualified judge of the court to which
the senior judge is assigned. The powers, jurisdiction  and judicial authority of the senior judge in
respect to any case or matter tried or heard by the senior judge while  serving under the assignment
shall continue beyond the expiration of the assignment so far as may be necessary to:
(a) Decide and dispose of any case or matter on trial or held under advisement.
(b) Hear and decide any motion for a new trial or for a judgment notwithstanding a verdict,  or
objections to any cost bill, that may be filed in the case.
(c) Settle a transcript for appeal and grant extensions of time therefor.
(5) A senior judge assigned as provided in this  section shall receive as compensation for each
day the senior judge is actually engaged in  the performance of duties under the assignment an
amount equal to five percent of  the gross monthly salary of a regularly elected and qualified judge
of the court  to which the senior judge is assigned, or one-half of that daily compensation for services
of one-half day or  less. However, a retired judge shall not receive for services as a senior judge
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 2
during any calendar year a sum of money  which when added to the amount of any judicial retire-
ment pay received by the senior judge for the year exceeds the  annual salary of a judge of the court
from which  the senior judge retired. The compensation shall be paid upon the certificate of the
senior judge  that the services were performed for the number of days shown in the certificate. Ser-
vices by a senior judge  under an assignment and receipt of compensation for services shall not re-
duce or otherwise affect the amount of any retirement pay to which the senior judge  otherwise
would be entitled.
(6) A senior judge assigned to a  court located outside the county in Oregon in which the senior
judge regularly  resides shall receive, in addition to daily compensation, reimbursement for hotel bills
and traveling expenses necessarily incurred in the  performance of duties under the assignment. The
expenses shall be paid upon presentation of an  itemized statement of the expenses, certified by the
senior judge to be correct.
SECTION 3.  ORS 133.545 is amended to read:
133.545. (1) A search warrant may be issued only by a judge. A search warrant issued by a judge
of the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals may be executed anywhere in the state.  Except as
otherwise provided in subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this  section, a search warrant issued by a judge
of a circuit court may be executed only within the judicial district in which the court is located.
A search warrant issued by a  justice of the peace may be executed only within the county in which
the justice court is located. A search  warrant issued by a municipal judge authorized to exercise the
powers and perform the duties of a justice of the peace  may be executed only in the municipality
in which the court is located.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, a circuit court judge may authorize execution
of a search warrant outside the judicial district in which the  court is located, if the judge finds from
the application that one or  more of the objects of the search relate to an offense committed or
triable within the  judicial district in which the court is located. If the warrant authorizes the in-
stallation or tracking of  a mobile tracking device, the officer may track the device in any county
to which it is transported.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a circuit court judge duly assigned  pursuant
to ORS 1.615 to serve as a judge pro  tempore in a circuit court , or a senior judge duly assigned
to serve in a circuit court under ORS 1.300 and who has authorization  from the presiding
judge of that judicial district,  may authorize execution of a search warrant in any judicial  district
in which the judge [ serves as judge pro tempore if the application requesting the warrant includes  an
affidavit showing that a regularly  elected or appointed circuit court judge for the judicial district is
not available, whether by reason of conflict of interest or other reason, to issue the  warrant within a
reasonable time ] is assigned to serve as judge pro tempore or as senior judge .
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, a circuit court judge may authorize execution
of a search warrant outside the judicial district in which the court is located if the judge finds  that:
(a) The search  relates to one of the following offenses involving a victim who was 65 years of
age or older at the time of the offense:
(A) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree as described in ORS 163.205 (1)(b)(D) or (E);
(B) Identity theft;
(C) Aggravated identity theft;
(D) Computer crime;
(E) Fraudulent use of a credit card;
(F) Forgery in any degree;
(G) Criminal possession of a forged instrument in any degree;
(H) Theft in any degree; or
(I) Aggravated theft in the first degree;
(b) The objects of the search consist of financial records; and
(c) The person making application  for the search warrant is not able to ascertain at the time
of the application the proper place of trial  for the offense described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section.
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 3
(5) Application for a search warrant may  be made only by a district attorney, a police officer
or a special agent employed under ORS 131.805.
(6) The application shall consist of a proposed warrant  in conformance with ORS 133.565, and
shall be supported by one or more affidavits particularly setting forth the facts  and circumstances
tending to show that the objects of the search are in the places, or in the possession of  the indi-
viduals, to be searched. If an affidavit is based in whole or in part on hearsay, the affiant  shall set
forth facts bearing on any unnamed informant’s reliability and shall disclose, as far as  possible, the
means by which the information was obtained.
(7) Instead of the written affidavit described in subsection (6) of this  section, the judge may take
an oral  statement under oath. The oral statement shall be recorded and a copy of the recording
submitted to the judge who  took the oral statement. In such cases, the judge shall certify that the
recording of the sworn oral statement is a true recording of the oral  statement under oath and shall
retain the recording as part of the record of proceedings for the issuance  of the warrant. The re-
cording shall constitute an affidavit for the purposes  of this section. The applicant shall retain a
copy of the recording  and shall provide a copy of the recording to the district attorney if the district
attorney is not the applicant.
(8)(a) In addition to the procedure set out in subsection (7) of this section, the  proposed warrant
and the affidavit may be sent to the court by facsimile transmission or any similar  electronic
transmission that delivers a complete printable image of the signed affidavit and  proposed warrant.
The affidavit may have a notarized acknowledgment, or  the affiant may swear to the affidavit by
telephone. If the affiant swears to the affidavit by telephone,  the affidavit may be signed electron-
ically. A judge administering an oath  telephonically under this subsection must execute a declara-
tion that recites the manner and time  of the oath’s administration. The declaration must be filed
with the return.
(b) When a court issues a warrant upon an application made under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section:
(A) The court may transmit the signed warrant  to the person making application under sub-
section (5) of this section by means of facsimile transmission or similar electronic transmission, as
described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection. The court shall file the original signed warrant and
a printed image of the application with the return.
(B) The person making application shall deliver the original  signed affidavit to the court with
the return. If  the affiant swore to the affidavit by telephone, the affiant must so note next to the
affiant’s signature on the affidavit.
SERVICE OF PARENTING TIME MOTION
SECTION 4.
 ORS 107.434 is amended to read:
107.434. (1) The presiding judge of each judicial  district shall establish an expedited parenting
time enforcement procedure that may or may  not include a requirement for mediation or partic-
ipation in an alternative dispute resolution conference  under ORS 107.103. The procedure must be
easy to understand and initiate. Unless the parties otherwise  agree or an alternative dispute resol-
ution conference under ORS 107.103 is scheduled, the court shall conduct  a hearing no later than
45 days after the filing of a motion seeking enforcement of a  parenting time order. The court shall
provide forms for:
(a) A motion filed by either party alleging a violation of parenting time or  substantial violations
of the parenting plan.  When  a person files this form, the  person must include a copy of the order
establishing the parenting time.
(b) An order requiring the parties to appear and show cause  why parenting time should not be
enforced in a specified manner. The party filing the motion shall serve a copy of  the motion and the
order on the other party  in the manner provided  by law for service of a summons . The order
must include:
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 4
(A) A notice of the remedies imposable under subsection (2)  of this section and the availability
of a waiver of any mediation requirement; and
(B) A notice in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
When pleaded and shown in a separate legal action, violation  of court orders, including
visitation and parenting time orders, may also result in  a finding of contempt, which can lead to
fines, imprisonment or other penalties, including compulsory community service.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(c) A motion, supported by an affidavit  or a declaration under penalty of perjury in the form
required by ORCP 1 E, and an order that  may be filed by either party and providing for waiver of
any mediation requirement on a showing of good cause.
(2) In addition to any other remedy the court may  impose to enforce the provisions of a judg-
ment relating to the parenting plan, the court may:
(a) Modify the provisions relating to the parenting plan by:
(A) Specifying a detailed parenting time schedule;
(B) Imposing additional terms and conditions on the existing parenting time schedule; or
(C) Ordering additional parenting time, in the best interests of  the child, to compensate for
wrongful deprivation of parenting time;
(b) Order the party who is violating the parenting plan provisions to post bond or security;
(c) Order  either or both parties to attend counseling or educational sessions that focus on the
impact of violation of the parenting plan on children;
(d) Award the prevailing party expenses, including,  but not limited to, attorney fees, filing fees
and court costs, incurred in enforcing the party’s parenting plan;
(e) Terminate, suspend or modify spousal support;
(f) Terminate, suspend or modify child support as provided in ORS 107.431; or
(g) Schedule a hearing for modification of custody as provided in ORS 107.135 (11).
ORCP CITATION CHANGE
SECTION 5.
 ORS 136.600 is amended to read:
136.600. The provisions of ORS 44.150 and ORCP 39 B  and [ 55 E and G ] 55 A(6)(d) and 55 B(4)
apply in criminal actions, examinations and proceedings.
ELECTRONIC RECORDS
SECTION 6.  ORS 7.095 is amended to read:
7.095. (1) Where the application  of electronic data processing techniques is determined to be
feasible and expedient in maintaining records of the courts  of this state, the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court may authorize records to be kept  by use of electronic data processing equipment.
Court records maintained as provided by this section shall contain the  information otherwise re-
quired by law for the records  of courts in this state.  Notwithstanding ORS 192.311 to 192.478,
records shall not be subject to public disclosure until reviewed and accepted by the court.
(2) The State  Court Administrator may prescribe standards governing the use of such tech-
niques, the preservation of the records so maintained, and controls to  prevent unauthorized access
to records maintained through the use of electronic data processing equipment.
CONTEMPT
SECTION 7.  ORS 21.135 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 5
21.135. (1) Unless a specific fee is provided by subsection (3) or (4) of this section or other law
for a proceeding, a circuit court shall collect a filing fee of $281 when a complaint  or other docu-
ment is filed for the purpose of commencing an action  or other civil proceeding and when an answer
or other first appearance is filed in the proceeding.
(2) Except as provided in  subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section, the filing fee established by sub-
section (1) of this section applies to:
(a) Proceedings in which only equitable remedies are sought.
(b) Appeals from a conviction of a violation in justice or municipal courts as provided  in ORS
21.285.
(c) Interpleader actions.
(d) Actions relating to a trust.
(e) Proceedings for judicial review of an agency order.
(f) Declaratory judgment actions.
(g) Any other action or proceeding that is statutorily made subject to  the fee established by this
section and any other civil proceeding for which a specific filing fee is not provided.
(3)(a) The circuit court shall collect a filing fee of $263 in adoption cases under ORS chapter
109, excluding readoptions under ORS 109.385, when a petition is filed for the purpose of  commenc-
ing an adoption proceeding or when any other  document or other first appearance is filed in the
proceeding.  The  fee shall include the cost of issuing one or more certificates of adoption under ORS
109.410.
(b) When separate  petitions for adoption of multiple minor children are concurrently filed under
ORS 109.276 by the same petitioner,  one filing fee shall be charged for the first petition filed and
the filing fees for concurrently filed petitions shall not be charged.
(4) The circuit court shall collect  a filing fee of $56 for actions seeking remedial sanctions
for contempt of court under  ORS 33.055 and when a first appearance is filed in the proceed-
ing.
[(4)] (5) The filing fee established under subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Expunction proceedings under ORS 419A.262;
(b) Petitions under ORS 163A.130 or 163A.135  for an order relieving the person from the duty
to report as a sex offender if the person is required to report under ORS 163A.025; or
(c) Any juvenile delinquency proceeding arising under ORS chapter 419B or 419C.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 21.200 is amended to read:
21.200. (1) In any action or other proceeding  subject to a fee under ORS 21.135, 21.145, 21.160
or 21.170, a $111 fee must be paid by the party filing one of the following  motions and by the party
responding to the motion:
(a) A motion for summary judgment under ORCP 47.
(b) A motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict under ORCP 63.
(c) A motion for new trial under ORCP 64.
(d) A motion for relief from judgment under ORCP 71.
(e) A motion for preliminary injunction under ORCP 79.
[(f) A motion seeking remedies for contempt of court. ]
(2) The fees provided for  in this section may not be collected from the state, a county, a city
or a school district.
(3) The fees provided for in this section may not be collected  for motions made to an arbitrator
or mediator in an arbitration or mediation required or  offered by a court, or to any motion relating
to an arbitration or mediation required or offered by a court.
(4) The clerk shall file  a motion or response that is subject to a fee under this section only if
the fee required by this section is paid when the motion or response is submitted for filing.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 21.205 is amended to read:
21.205. (1) In any action or other proceeding  subject to a fee under ORS 21.155, a $167 fee must
be paid by the party filing a motion that seeks entry of a  supplemental judgment and by a party
responding to the motion.
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 6
(2) The fee provided for in subsection (1) of this section does not apply  to any motion under
ORCP 68, 69 or 71.
(3) In any action or other proceeding subject to a fee under ORS 21.155,  a $56 fee must be paid
by the party filing [ one of the following  motions ] a motion under ORS 107.434  and by a party re-
sponding to the motion[ :].
[(a) A motion filed under ORS 107.434; and ]
[(b) A motion seeking remedies for contempt of court. ]
[(4) Only the  fees specified by subsection (1) of this section may be collected if a party concurrently
files a motion that seeks  entry of a supplemental judgment and a motion seeking remedies for contempt
of court. ]
SECTION 10.  ORS 33.055 is amended to read:
33.055. (1) Except as otherwise provided in ORS  161.685, proceedings to impose remedial sanc-
tions for contempt shall be conducted as provided in this section.
(2) The following persons may initiate the proceeding [ or, with leave of the court, participate in
the proceeding, by  filing a motion requesting that ] by filing an action and may request that the
contempt defendant be ordered to appear:
(a) A party aggrieved by an alleged contempt of court.
(b) A district attorney.
(c) A city attorney.
(d) The Attorney General.
(e) Any other person specifically authorized by statute to seek imposition of sanctions  for con-
tempt.
(3) If the alleged contempt is related to another proceeding, [ a motion ] an action  to initiate a
proceeding to impose remedial sanctions must be filed in accordance with rules  adopted under ORS
33.145.
(4) The  person initiating a proceeding under this section shall file supporting documentation or
affidavits sufficient to give the contempt  defendant notice  of the specific acts alleged to constitute
contempt.
(5)(a) The contempt defendant shall be served with the document initiating the  contempt
action in the manner provided in ORCP  7. The court may issue an order directing the contempt
defendant to appear. Except as  otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the contempt
defendant shall be personally served with the order to appear in the manner provided in  ORCP 7
[and 9 ]. If the contempt defendant is represented by counsel in  a proceeding to which the
action for contempt under this section is related,  that counsel shall also be served with the
initiating instrument and  any order to appear in the manner provided in ORCP 9.  The court
may order service by a method other than personal service on the  contempt defendant  or issue
an arrest warrant if, based  upon motion and supporting affidavit, the court finds that the contempt
defendant cannot be personally served.
(b) The contempt defendant shall be served  by substituted service if personal service is waived
under ORS 107.835. If personal service is waived under ORS 107.835, the contempt defendant shall
be served by the method specified in the waiver.
(6) The court may impose a remedial sanction only after  affording the contempt defendant op-
portunity for a hearing tried to the  court. The contempt defendant may waive the opportunity for
a hearing by stipulated order filed with the court.
(7) A contempt defendant has no right  to a jury trial and, except as provided in this section,
has only those rights accorded to a defendant in a civil action.
(8) A contempt defendant is entitled to be represented by  counsel. A court shall not impose on
a contempt defendant a remedial sanction of confinement unless, before the hearing is held, the
contempt defendant is:
(a) Informed that such sanction may be imposed; and
(b) Afforded the same right to appointed counsel  required in proceedings for the imposition of
an equivalent punitive sanction of confinement.
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 7
(9) If the contempt defendant is not represented by counsel when coming before the court,  the
court shall inform the contempt defendant of the right  to counsel, and of the right to appointed
counsel if the contempt defendant is entitled to,  and financially eligible for, appointed counsel un-
der subsection (8) of this section.
(10) Inability to comply with an order of the court is an affirmative defense.
(11) In any proceeding for imposition of a  remedial sanction other than confinement, proof of
contempt shall be by clear and convincing evidence. In any proceeding for imposition of a  remedial
sanction of confinement, proof of contempt shall be beyond a reasonable doubt.
(12) Proceedings under this section are subject to rules adopted under ORS 33.145.  Proceedings
under this section are  not subject to the Oregon Rules of Civil Procedure except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section or as may be provided in rules adopted under ORS 33.145.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (6), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for court  mandated
expenses, is increased by $902,665 for the purpose of carrying out the amendments to ORS
21.345 by section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5514), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for defense of criminal convictions,
is increased by $50,000 for the purpose  of carrying out the amendments to ORS 21.345 by
section 1 of this 2023 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 13. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 14. The amendments to ORS 21.345 and 107.434 by sections 1 and 4 of this  2023
Act become operative  on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023 regular session of the
Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
SECTION 15. The amendments to ORS 21.135, 21.200,  21.205 and 33.055 by sections 7 to
10 of this 2023 Act become operative on October 1, 2023.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 16. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 8
Passed by House June 7, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2225 (HB 2225-A) Page 9